District of Columbia statutes.
47-4215

Repealed

Underpayment of estimated tax by corporations, financial institutions, and unincorporated businesses.

[Repealed].

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 403(b), 48 DCR 334
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(yy), 50 DCR 896
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 8062(b), 58 DCR 6226
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7122(c), 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 47-2763 and § 47-4201.
D.C. Law 14-282 rewrote subsec. (e)(1) which had read as follows: “(1) The tax shown on the return for the taxable year (or, if no return is filed, the tax) reduced by applicable credits and estimated payments which are made timely, is less than $100; or”
D.C. Law 19-21 rewrote subsec. (b)(1)(B)(ii), which formerly read:
“(ii) One hundred percent of the tax shown on the return of the entity for the preceding taxable year if the individual filed a return for the preceding taxable year consisting of 12 months.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(hhh) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(hhh) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(ggg) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(hhh) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(hhh) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Self-Assessing Taxpayer Fairness in Notice Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-241, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 262).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Self-Assessing Taxpayer Fairness in Notice Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-241, December 22, 2005, 53 DCR 262).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 7132(c) and 7133 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 7122(c) and 7123 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 7122(c) and 7123 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-155: Section 7123 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that this subtitle shall be applicable for tax years beginning after December 31, 2014.